District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-903

Criminal Justice Supervisory Board and Office of Criminal Justice Plans and Analysis; membership; staff.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-107, § 4, 25 DCR 1391
Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-24, § 2, 3, 26 DCR 405
July 23, 1992, D.C. Law 9-134, § 301(b)(2), (3), 39 DCR 4066
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-145, § 301(b)(2), (3), 39 DCR 4895
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 514, 60 DCR 3390
Disclosure of financial interests, requirements, see § 1-1106.02.
1981 Ed., § 2-1103.
1973 Ed., § 2-2503.

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 301(b)(2), (3) of Omnibus Budget Support Temporary Act of 1992 (D.C. Law 9-134, July 23, 1992, law notification 39 DCR 5815).

For temporary amendment of section, see § 301(b)(2) and (3) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-203, April 29, 1992, 39 DCR 3219).
For temporary repeal of section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 515 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).
“Section 223 of the Juvenile Justice Act” referred to in subsections (b)(14), (b)(15) and (c), is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 5633.

For temporary transfer of functions of the Office of Criminal Justice Plans and Analysis, established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, and all positions, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available to or to be made available relating to the functions of the Office of Criminal Justice Plans and Analysis to the Mayor’s Office of Policy and Programs Evaluation, see § 301(a) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1992 (D.C. Act 9-203, April 29, 1992, 39 DCR 3219).

Section 301(a) of D.C. Law 9-134 provided that the functions of the Office of Criminal Justice Plans and Analysis, and all positions, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available to or to be made available relating to the functions of the Office of Criminal Justice Plans and Analysis are transferred to the Mayor’s Office of Policy and Program Evaluation.

Section 501(c)(3) of D.C. Law 9-134 provided that § 301 shall apply as of October 1, 1992.

Section 601(b) of D.C. Law 9-134 provided that the act shall expire on the 225th day of its having taken effect.

Section 301(a) of D.C. Law 9-145 provided that the functions of the Office of Criminal Justice Plans and Analysis, and all positions, property, records, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds available to or to be made available relating to the functions of the Office of Criminal Justice Plans and Analysis are transferred to the Mayor’s Office of Policy and Program Evaluation.

Designation of an Agency to Administer the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act, see Mayor’s Order 2000-149, October

Application of § 301 of Law 9-145: Section 501(c)(3) of D.C. Law 9-145 provided that § 301 shall apply as of October 1, 1992.

Funding authorized: Section 824 of the Act of December 27, 1979, 93 Stat. 1167, Pub. L. 96-157, authorized funding for the District’s state planning agency according to a special formula.